New Jersey, session 222, S3085.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2004, c.96 (C.54:40A-4.2) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  A person shall not sell, offer for sale, give away, or deliver single cigarettes, as defined in section 102 of P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-2) or cigarettes in packs of less than 20 cigarettes from a vending machine or in a retail establishment. b.    A person who owns a vending machine that dispenses, sells, offers for sale, gives away, or delivers single cigarettes or cigarettes in packs of less than 20 cigarettes shall be fined not less than [$100] $200 or more than [$500] $1,000 for each day that the vending machine is determined to be in violation of subsection a. of this section. c.     A person, either acting directly or indirectly through an agent, who, at retail, sells or offers for sale, gives away, delivers, or otherwise furnishes to a person a single cigarette or cigarettes in packs of less than 20 cigarettes shall be fined [$250] $500 for a first offense and [$500] $1,000 for a second or subsequent offense. (cf:  P.L.2004, c.96, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.